Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-34] Buyer's guide. The
commissioner by rule shall require delivery of a buyer's guide or a similar
consumer advisory package to owners during the process of soliciting a life
settlement contract. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next